Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 26.6 The Renewable Energy Growth Program

39-26.6-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to facilitate and promote installation of grid-connected generation of renewable energy; support and encourage development of distributed renewable energy generation systems; reduce environmental impacts; reduce carbon emissions that contribute to climate change by encouraging the siting of renewable energy projects in the load zone of the electric distribution company; diversify the energy-generation sources within the load zone of the electric distribution company; stimulate economic development; improve distribution-system resilience and reliability within the load zone of the electric distribution company; and reduce distribution system costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-2.
Renewable energy growth program established.

To carry out these purposes, a tariff-based, renewable energy distributed-generation financing program, hereinafter referred to as the renewable energy growth program, is hereby established with the intention of continuing the development of renewable energy distributed generation in the load zone of the electric distribution company at reasonable cost. The program shall be designed to finance the development, construction, and operation of renewable energy distributed-generation projects over five (5) years through a performance-based incentive system that is designed to achieve specified megawatt targets at reasonable cost through competitive processes. The renewable energy growth program shall be implemented by the electric distribution company, and guided by the distributed-generation board, in consultation with the office of energy resources, subject to the review and supervision of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Board” shall mean the distributed-generation board as established pursuant to the provisions of §

39-26.2-10

under the title distributed generation standard contract board, but shall also fulfill the responsibilities set forth in this chapter.

“Ceiling price” means the bidding price cap applicable to an enrollment for a given distributed-generation class, that shall be approved annually for each renewable energy class pursuant to the procedure established in this chapter. The ceiling price for each technology should be a price that would allow a private owner to invest in a given project at a reasonable rate of return, based on recently reported and forecast information on the cost of capital and the cost of generation equipment. The calculation of the reasonable rate of return for a project shall include, where applicable, any state or federal incentives, including, but not limited to, tax incentives.

“Commercial-scale solar project” means a solar distributed-generation project with the nameplate capacity specified in §

39-26.6-7

.

“Commission” means the Rhode Island public utilities commission.

“Community remote distributed-generation system” means a distributed-generation facility greater than two hundred fifty kilowatt (250 KW) nameplate direct current that allocates bill credits for each kilowatt hour (KWh) generated to a minimum of three (3), eligible recipient-customer accounts, provided that no more than fifty percent (50%) of the credits produced by the system are allocated to one eligible recipient-customer account, and provided further that at least fifty percent (50%) of the credits produced by the system are allocated to eligible recipients in an amount not to exceed that which is produced annually by twenty-five kilowatt (25 KW) AC capacity. The community remote distributed-generation system may transfer credits to eligible recipient-customer accounts in an amount that is equal to, or less than, the sum of the usage of the eligible recipient-customer accounts measured by the three-year-average (3) annual consumption of energy over the previous three (3) years. A projected, annual consumption of energy may be used until the actual three-year-average (3) annual consumption of energy over the previous three (3) years at the eligible recipient-customer accounts becomes available for use in determining eligibility of the generating system. The community remote distributed-generation system may be owned by the same entity that is the customer of record on the net-metered account or may be owned by a third party.

“Distributed-generation facility” means an electrical-generation facility located in the electric distribution company’s load zone with a nameplate capacity no greater than five megawatts (5 MW), using eligible renewable energy resources as defined by §

39-26-5

, including biogas created as a result of anaerobic digestion, but, specifically excluding all other listed eligible biomass fuels, and connected to an electrical power system owned, controlled, or operated by the electric distribution company. For purposes of this chapter, a distributed-generation facility must be a new resource that:

Has not begun operation;

Is not under construction, but excluding preparatory site work that is less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the estimated total project cost; and

Except for small-scale solar projects, does not have in place investment or lending agreements necessary to finance the construction of the facility prior to the submittal of an application or bid for which the payment of performance-based incentives is sought under this chapter except to the extent that such financing agreements are conditioned upon the project owner being awarded performance-based incentives under the provisions of this chapter. For purposes of this definition, preexisting hydro generation shall be exempt from the provisions of subsection (6)(i) regarding operation, if the hydro-generation facility will need a material investment to restore or maintain reliable and efficient operation and meet all regulatory, environmental, or operational requirements. For purposes of this provision, “material investment” shall mean investment necessary to allow the project to qualify as a new, renewable energy resource under §

39-26-2

. To be eligible for this exemption, the hydro-project developer at the time of submitting a bid in the applicable procurement must provide reasonable evidence with its bid application showing the level of investment needed, along with any other facts that support a finding that the investment is material, the determination of which shall be a part of the bid review process set forth in §

39-26.6-16

for the award of bids.

“Distributed-generation project” means a distinct installation of a distributed-generation facility. An installation will be considered distinct if it does not violate the segmentation prohibition set forth in §

39-26.6-9

.

“Electric distribution company” means a company defined in §

39-1-2(a)(12)

, supplying standard-offer service, last-resort service, or any successor service to end-use customers, but not including the Block Island Power Company or the Pascoag Utility District.

“ISO-NE” means Independent System Operator-New England, the Regional Transmission Organization for New England designated by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

“Large distributed-generation project” means a distributed-generation project that has a nameplate capacity that exceeds the size of a small distributed-generation project in a given year, but is no greater than five megawatts (5 MW) nameplate capacity.

“Large-scale solar project” means a solar distributed-generation project with the nameplate capacity specified in §

39-26.6-7

.

“Medium-scale solar project” means a solar distributed-generation project with the nameplate capacity specified in §

39-26.6-7

.

“Office” means the Rhode Island office of energy resources.

“Program year” means a year beginning April 1 and ending March 31, except for the first program year, that may commence after April 1, 2015, subject to commission approval.

“Renewable energy certificate” means a New England Generation Information System renewable energy certificate as defined in §

39-26-2(14)

.

“Renewable energy classes” means categories for different renewable energy technologies using eligible renewable energy resources as defined by §

39-26-5

, including biogas created as a result of anaerobic digestion, but, specifically excluding all other listed eligible biomass fuels specified in §

39-26-2(6)

. For each program year, in addition to the classes of solar distributed generation specified in §

39-26.6-7

, the board shall determine the renewable energy classes as are reasonably feasible for use in meeting distributed-generation objectives from renewable energy resources and are consistent with the goal of meeting the annual target for the program year. The board may make recommendations to the commission to add, eliminate, or adjust renewable energy classes for each program year, provided that the solar classifications set forth in §

39-26.6-7

shall remain in effect for at least the first two (2) program years and no distributed-generation project may exceed five megawatts (5 MW) of nameplate capacity.

“Shared solar facility” means a single small-scale or medium-scale solar facility that must allocate bill credits to at least two (2), and no more than fifty (50), accounts in the same customer class and on the same or adjacent parcels of land. Public entities may allocate such bill credits to at least two (2), and up to fifty (50), accounts without regard to physical location so long as the facility and accounts are within the same municipality. In no case will the annual allocated credits in KWh exceed the prior three-year (3) annual average usage, less any reductions for verified energy-efficiency measures installed at the customer premises, of the customer account to which the bill credits are transferred.

“Small distributed-generation project” means a distributed-generation renewable energy project that has a nameplate capacity within the following: Wind: fifty kilowatts (50 KW) to one and one-half megawatts (1.5 MW); small-scale solar projects and medium-scale solar projects with the capacity limits as specified in §

39-26.6-7

. For technologies other than solar and wind, the board shall set the nameplate capacity-size limits, but such limits may not exceed one megawatt (1 MW).

“Small-scale solar project” means a solar distributed-generation project with the nameplate capacity specified in §

39-26.6-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 149, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 163, § 4; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 21.

39-26.6-4.
Continuation of board.

The distributed generation standard contract board shall remain fully constituted and authorized as provided in chapter 26.2 of this title; provided, however, that the name shall be changed to the “distributed-generation board.” Additional purposes of the board shall be to:

Evaluate and make recommendations to the commission regarding ceiling prices and annual targets, the make-up of renewable energy classifications eligible under the distributed-generation growth program, the terms of the tariffs, and other duties as set forth in this chapter;

Provide consistent, comprehensive, informed, and publicly accountable involvement by representatives of all interested stakeholders affected by, involved with, or knowledgeable about the development of distributed-generation projects that are eligible for performance-based incentives under the distributed-generation growth program; and

Monitor and evaluate the effectiveness of the distributed-generation growth program.

The office, in consultation with the board, shall be authorized to hire, or to request the electric distribution company to hire, the services of qualified consultants to perform ceiling price studies subject to commission approval that shall be granted or denied within sixty (60) days of receipt of such request from the office. The cost of the studies shall be recoverable through the rate-reconciliation provisions of the electric distribution company set forth in §

39-26.6-25

, subject to commission approval. In addition, the office, in consultation with the board, may request the commission to approve other costs incurred by the board, office, or the electric distribution company to utilize consultants for annual programmatic services or to perform any other studies and reports, subject to the review and approval of the commission, that shall be granted or denied within one hundred twenty (120) days of receipt of the request from the office, and that shall be recoverable through the same reconciliation provisions.

Revenues generated through the rate reconciliation process to finance the expenses incurred as outlined in subsection (b) shall be transferred to the office and deposited in a restricted-receipt account within the general fund. The restricted-receipt account shall be exempt from the indirect cost recovery assessment under §

35-4-27

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 149, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 163, § 4; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 7, § 3.

39-26.6-5.
Tariffs proposed and approved.

Each year, for a period of at least five (5) program years, the electric distribution company shall file tariffs with the commission that are designed to provide a multiyear stream of performance-based incentives to eligible renewable-distributed-generation projects for a term of years, under terms and conditions set forth in the tariffs and approved by the commission. The tariffs shall set forth the rights and obligations of the owner of the distributed-generation project and the conditions upon which payment of performance-based incentives by the electric distribution company will be paid. The tariffs shall include the non-price conditions set forth in §§

39-26.2-7(2)(i)

— (vii) for small distributed-generation projects (other than small- and medium-scale solar) and large distributed-generation projects; provided, however, that the time periods for the projects to reach ninety percent (90%) of output shall be extended to twenty-four (24) months (other than eligible anaerobic-digestion projects, which shall be thirty-six (36) months, and eligible small-scale hydro, which shall be forty-eight (48) months). The non-price conditions in the tariffs for small- and medium-scale solar shall take into account the different circumstances for distributed-generation projects of the smaller sizes.

In addition to the tariff(s), the filing shall include the rules governing the solicitation and enrollment process. The solicitation rules will be designed to ensure the orderly functioning of the distributed-generation growth program and shall be consistent with the legislative purposes of this chapter.

In proposing the tariff(s) and solicitation rules applicable to each year, the tariff(s) and rules shall be developed by the electric distribution company and will be reviewed by the office and the board before being sent to the commission for its approval. The proposed tariffs shall include the ceiling prices and term lengths for each tariff that are recommended by the board. The term lengths shall be from fifteen (15) to twenty (20) years; provided, however, that the board may recommend shorter terms for small-scale solar projects. Whatever term lengths between fifteen (15) and twenty (20) years are chosen for any given tariff, the evaluation of the bids for that tariff shall be done on a consistent basis such that the same term lengths for competing bids are used to determine the winning bids.

The board shall use the same standards for setting ceiling prices as set forth in §

39-26.2-5

. In setting the ceiling prices, the board may specifically consider:

Transactions for newly developed renewable energy resources, by technology and size, in the ISO-NE control area and the northeast corridor;

Pricing from bids received during the previous program year;

Environmental benefits, including, but not limited to, reducing carbon emissions;

For community remote distributed-generation systems, administrative costs and financial benefits for participating customers;

System benefits; and

Cost-effectiveness.

At least forty-five (45) days before filing the tariff(s) and solicitation rules, the electric distribution company shall provide the tariff(s) and rules in draft form to the board for review. The commission shall have the authority to determine the final terms and conditions in the tariff and rules. Once approved, the commission shall retain exclusive jurisdiction over the performance-based incentive payments, terms, conditions, rights, enforcement, and implementation of the tariffs and rules, subject to appeals pursuant to chapter 5 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 149, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 163, § 4.

39-26.6-6.
Permanence of tariff terms once set.

It is the intention of the general assembly in enacting this chapter that the developers, owners, investors, customers, and lenders of the distributed-generation projects receiving performance-based incentives under the tariffs be able to rely on the tariffs for the entire term of the applicable tariff for purposes of obtaining financing. Consistent with that intention and expectation, the terms under the tariffs for a given program year, once approved by the commission, shall not be altered in any way that would undermine such reliance on those tariffs during the applicable terms of the tariffs; and in no circumstance will the performance-based incentive rate paid to a renewable energy project developer or owner be reduced during the term of the tariff once a renewable energy project has qualified to receive a tariff under the terms of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-7.
Solar project size categories.

Tariff(s) shall be proposed for each of the following solar distributed-generation classes:

Small-scale solar projects;

Medium-scale solar projects;

Commercial-scale solar projects; and

Large-scale solar projects.

Such classes of solar distributed-generation projects shall be established based on nameplate megawatt size as follows:

Large scale: solar projects from one megawatt (1 MW), up to and including, five megawatts (5 MW) nameplate capacity;

Commercial scale: solar projects greater than two hundred fifty kilowatts (250 KW), but less than one megawatt (1 MW) nameplate capacity;

Medium scale: solar projects greater than twenty-five kilowatts (25 KW), up to and including, two hundred fifty kilowatts (250 KW) nameplate capacity; and

Small scale: solar projects, up to and including, twenty-five kilowatts (25 KW) nameplate capacity.

Other classifications of solar projects may also be proposed by the board, subject to the approval of the commission. After the second program year, the board may make recommendations to the commission to adjust the size categories of the solar classes, provided that the medium-scale solar projects may not exceed two hundred fifty kilowatts (250 KW); and/or allocated capacity to community distributed-generation facilities, allowing them to compete or enroll under a distinct ceiling price.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 149, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 163, § 4.

39-26.6-8.
Renewable technologies other than solar.

Tariffs also shall be proposed for on-shore wind and any other distributed-generation technologies permissible under this chapter that the board, in its discretion, recommends; provided, however, that no project shall exceed five megawatts (5 MW) nameplate capacity. The electric distribution company shall file tariffs for each technology and size categories recommended by the board pursuant to the procedures set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-9.
Project segmentation prohibition.

In no case may a project developer be allowed to segment a distributed-generation project on the same parcel or contiguous parcels into smaller-sized projects in order to fall under a smaller-size project classification. Notwithstanding this prohibition, a project developer may designate a generation unit on the same parcel or contiguous parcel for net metering or other means of participating in electricity markets, provided that the unit, or portion of the unit, designated for net metering or other market participation is not receiving performance-based incentives under this chapter; is capable of being segregated electrically; is configured with the electrical segregation; and is separately metered. Further, a project shall not be considered to have been segmented if:

There is a lapse of at least twenty-four (24) months between: (i) The commencement of construction of new distributed-generation units on a parcel that is the same as, or is contiguous with, a parcel upon which a distributed-generation project has already been constructed; and (ii) The operation date of the preexisting project; or

The new project is a different renewable technology.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-10.
Timing and schedule of tariff filings.

The electric distribution company shall file with the commission the first set of tariffs and solicitation rules pursuant to this chapter no later than November 15, 2014. Thereafter, the electric distribution company shall make annual tariff and solicitation rules filings with the commission no later than November 15 prior to the beginning of the applicable program year, which tariffs and rules shall be applicable for the next program year.

Upon receiving the filing from the electric distribution company, the commission shall open a docket to consider the filing. The commission shall issue an order approving the proposed tariffs and solicitation rules; provided, however, that the commission may make any modifications that it deems appropriate consistent with the legislative purposes of this chapter as set forth herein.

For the first program year, the commission shall issue its order approving tariff(s) and solicitation rules by no later than March 31, 2015. Thereafter, the commission shall approve them by February 15 of each succeeding year.

During the course of any program year, the electric distribution company may, at any time, in consultation with the office and the board, propose tariff or solicitation rules modifications. The commission shall consider the proposed modifications through an already open or new docket, and shall issue its order within one hundred five (105) days of the filing of the proposed modification. If approved, the proposed modification shall take effect for the next enrollment event following the issuance of the commission’s order.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-11.
Power purchase agreements not required.

The distributed-generation growth program shall be implemented and administered exclusively through the tariff structure and procedures set forth in this chapter, and the electric distribution company shall not be required to execute power purchase agreements for the procurement of the renewable energy distributed-generation capacity requirements set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-12.
Annual bidding and enrollments.

With the exception of the first program year (2015), the electric distribution company, in consultation with the board and office, shall conduct at least three (3) tariff enrollments for each distributed-generation class each program year. For the first program year, the board may recommend that either two (2) or three (3) enrollments be conducted.

During each program year, the tariff enrollments shall have both an annual targeted amount of nameplate megawatts (“annual MW target”) and a nameplate megawatt target for each separate enrollment event (“enrollment MW target”). The enrollment MW target shall comprise the specific portion of the annual MW target sought to be obtained in that enrollment. The enrollment MW targets shall be recommended by the board each year, subject to commission approval. The board shall also recommend a megawatt target for each class (“class MW target”) that comprises a specified portion of the enrollment MW target, subject to commission approval. If the electric distribution company, the office, and the board mutually agree, they may reallocate megawatts during an enrollment from one class to another without commission approval if there is an over-subscription in one class and an under-subscription in another, provided that the annual MW target is not being exceeded, except as provided in §

39-26.6-7

.

The annual MW targets shall be established as follows; provided, however, that at least three megawatts (3 MW) of nameplate capacity shall be carved out exclusively for small-scale solar projects in each of the first four (4) program years:

For the first program year (2015), the annual MW target shall be twenty-five nameplate megawatts (25 MW);

For the second program year, the annual targets shall be forty nameplate megawatts (40 MW);

For the third and fourth program years, the annual target shall be forty nameplate megawatts (40 MW), subject to the conditions set forth in subsection (f) of this section having been met for the applicable prior program year as determined in the manner specified in subsection (g) of this section;

For the fifth program year, the annual target shall be set to obtain the balance of capacity needed to achieve one hundred sixty nameplate megawatts (160 MW) within the five-year (5) distributed-generation growth program, subject to subsection (e) of this section and the conditions set forth in subsection (f) of this section having been met for the fourth program year as determined in the manner specified in subsection (g) of this section; and

From the year 2020 through the year 2029, the annual target for each program year shall be an additional forty nameplate megawatts (40 MW) above the annual target for the preceding program year.

During the fifth year of the distributed-generation growth program, the board may recommend to the commission an extension of time in the event that additional time is required to achieve the full one hundred sixty nameplate megawatt (160 MW) target of the program. The commission shall approve the recommendation of the board; provided, however, that the commission may make any modifications to the board’s recommendation that the commission deems appropriate, consistent with the legislative purposes of this chapter as set forth herein.

To the extent there was a shortfall of capacity procured under chapter 26.2 of this title from distributed-generation procurements in 2014, such shortfall amount may be added to the one hundred sixty megawatt (160 MW) target for acquisition in the fifth program year under this chapter. In no event shall the electric distribution company be required to exceed the aggregate amount of one hundred sixty (160) nameplate capacity plus any such shortfall amount over the five (5) years, but may do so voluntarily, in consultation with the board and subject to commission approval.

The conditions specified in subsections (c)(3) and (c)(4) of this section are as follows: (1) That it is reasonable to conclude that the bid prices submitted in the procurements for the large-scale solar and commercial-scale solar classes were reasonably competitive in the immediately preceding program year; (2) That it is reasonable to conclude that the annual MW target specified for the next program year is reasonably achievable; and (3) That the electric distribution company was able to, or with reasonably prudent efforts should have been able to, perform the studies and system upgrades on a timely basis necessary to accommodate the number of applications associated with the targets without materially adversely affecting other electric-distribution construction projects needed to provide reliable and safe electric-distribution service. To the extent the board or the commission concludes that any of these conditions have not been met for the applicable program year, the board may recommend, and/or the commission may adopt, a new annual MW target, based on the factors set forth in subsection (h) of this section.

Before the third, fourth, and fifth program years, each year the board shall review the conditions specified in subsection (f) of this section and make a recommendation to the commission for findings as to whether they have been met for the applicable year. The recommendation shall be filed with the commission, with copies to the office and the electric distribution company, and any person who has made a written request to the commission to be included in such notification, such list which may be obtained from the commission clerk, and a notice of such filing shall be posted by the commission on its website. If no party files an objection to the recommended findings within ten (10) business days of the posting, the commission may accept them without hearings. If an objection is filed with a reasonable explanation for its basis, the commission shall hold hearings and make the factual determination of whether the conditions have been met.

In the event that the conditions in subsection (f) of this section have not been met for any program year, then the board and the commission shall take into account the factors set forth below in setting the annual MW target for the following year. In addition, for every program year the board and the commission shall take into account these factors in setting the class MW targets, and the enrollment MW targets for the following year: (1) That the new annual, class, and enrollment levels reasonably assure that competition among projects for the applicable bidding classifications remains robust and likely to yield reasonable and competitive program costs; (2) That, assuming prudent management of the program, the electric distribution company should be able to perform the studies and system upgrades on a timely basis necessary to accommodate the number of applications associated with the targets without materially adversely affecting other electric-distribution construction projects needed to provide reliable and safe electric-distribution service; and (3) Any other reasonable factors that are consistent with the legislative purpose of this chapter as set forth herein, including the program purpose to facilitate the development of renewable distributed generation in the load zone of the electric distribution company at reasonable cost.

The renewable energy growth program is intended to achieve at least an aggregate amount of one hundred sixty nameplate megawatts (160 MW) over five (5) years, plus any shortfall amount added in pursuant to subsection (e) of this section. However, after the second program year, the board may, based on market data and other information available to it, including pricing received during previous program years, recommend changes to the annual target for any program year above or below the specified targets in subsection (c) of this section if the board concludes that market conditions are likely to produce favorably low or unfavorably high target pricing during the upcoming program year, provided that the recommendation may not result in the five-year (5), one-hundred-sixty-megawatt-nameplate (160 MW) target, plus any shortfall added pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, being exceeded. Any megawatt reduction in an annual target shall be added to the target in the fifth year of the program (and any subsequent years if necessary) such that the overall program target of one-hundred-sixty-megawatt-nameplate (160 MW) capacity, plus any shortfall added pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, is achieved. In considering these issues, the board and the commission may take into account the reasonableness of current pricing and its impact on all electric distribution customers and the legislative purpose of this chapter as set forth herein, including the program purpose to facilitate the development of renewable distributed generation in the load zone of the electric distribution company at reasonable cost.

The provisions of §

39-26.1-4

shall apply to the annual value of performance-based incentives (actual payments plus the value of net-metering credits, as applicable) provided by the electric distribution company to all the distributed-generation projects under this chapter, subject to the following conditions:

The targets set for the applicable program year for the applicable project classifications were met or, if not met, such failure was due to factors beyond the reasonable control of the electric distribution company;

The electric distribution company has processed applications for service and completed interconnections in a timely and prudent manner for the projects under this chapter, taking into account factors within the electric distribution company’s reasonable control. The commission is authorized to establish more specific performance standards to implement the provisions of this chapter; and

The incentive shall be one and three-quarters percent (1.75%) of the annual value of performance-based incentives. The commission is authorized to establish more specific performance standards to implement the provisions of this paragraph.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 56, § 1.

39-26.6-13.
Cost reconciliation.

To the extent the electric distribution company incurs incremental costs to meet the program objectives or make billing system improvements that are required to facilitate payments of performance-based incentives and administering net metering, the electric distribution company may elect to recover those incremental costs through the annual charge set forth in §

39-26.6-25

, subject to commission review and approval that assures such costs were properly and prudently incurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-14.
Existing powers of agencies and advocacy rights of parties unchanged.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to derogate from the statutory authority of the commission or the division of public utilities and carriers, including, but not limited to, the authority to protect ratepayers from unreasonable rates. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude any party from advocating a position in commission proceedings that differs from the recommendations made by the board to the commission or in any filing with the commission relating to this chapter, including, without limitation: (1) Individual or organizational members of the board; (2) Participants in board deliberations; (3) The office; and (4) The electric distribution company, unless the party has consented by vote to the execution or executed a settlement agreement agreeing to the terms, policy proposals, or any other matter proposed to the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-15.
Bidding and incentive award processes for solar DG projects.

Large-scale and commercial-scale solar projects and distributed-generation projects for other eligible technologies shall bid a price-per-kilowatt-hour for the entire output of the facility (net of any station service) that shall not exceed the applicable ceiling price. Small-scale and medium-scale solar projects will submit an enrollment application to receive a standard performance-based incentive for the period of years in the applicable tariff, that shall be a price-per-kilowatt-hour for the entire output of the facility. Except for megawatts that may be allocated to the energy-efficiency program pursuant to §

39-26.6-19

, small- and medium-scale projects shall be selected on a first-come, first-served basis, or by means of a commission-approved lottery system, or such other method as may be recommended by the board and approved by the commission.

Except for the first program year, the board shall determine, subject to commission approval, the standard performance-based incentive for small- and medium-sized solar projects from the average bid price from the last two (2) procurement enrollments conducted in the commercial-scale and/or large-scale solar projects class. For the first program year, the board may derive the standard performance incentive for small- and medium-sized solar projects from the bidding data obtained from the distributed-generation program in effect in 2014 under the provisions of chapter 26.2 of this title until there is bidding data from the first procurement under the new program which shall then be used to set a new standard performance incentive. The standard performance incentive may be set at a higher rate than payments for commercial-scale and large-scale solar projects in order to take into account the potentially higher per-unit cost of smaller projects. The standard performance incentive also shall be adjusted upward or downward, as needed, in order to take into account the term length over which the incentive shall be paid for the small- and medium-scale solar projects if such terms are different than the terms applicable to the classes from which the standard performance incentive was derived.

For each program year, the board shall recommend to the commission a standard performance incentive for each of the small-scale and medium-scale solar project classifications. Upon receiving the recommendations from the board, the commission shall open a docket to consider the recommendations or address the recommendations in its approval process for the program year in a consolidated docket as provided in §

39-26.6-10

. The commission shall issue its order approving the recommendations no later than concurrently with approval of the entire program and tariffs applicable to the program year; provided, however, that the commission may make modifications or changes to the board’s recommendations consistent with the legislative purposes of this chapter.

If after the first program year, the applications for the medium-scale solar projects are significantly over-subscribed, then the board and the electric distribution company, in consultation with the office, may propose to the commission a bidding process for medium-scale projects or a subset of the medium-scale projects under which project selections would be made based on the lowest bids, rather than first-come, first-served or such other method previously approved by the commission. The commission shall approve the proposal from the board and electric company within ninety (90) days; provided, however, that the commission may make changes to the proposal consistent with the legislative purposes of this chapter.

The commission shall approve the bidding process for medium-scale solar projects recommended by the board only if the commission finds that such bidding process is in a sufficiently simple form that is not administratively burdensome to bidders, and will not have the effect of discouraging participation in the distributed-generation growth program by developers of medium-scale solar projects that may be unrepresented by counsel.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.